Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 1. Dilution or Adulteration

§ 2801.
Adulteration prohibited.

It is prohibited to sell, transfer, or offer for sale any adulterated dairy product which does not conform to Vermont statutes and regulations adopted thereunder. Nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit the salvage of milk solids for human consumption under regulations adopted by the Secretary.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 14; amended

1969, No. 73

, § 5, eff. April 18, 1969;

2003, No. 42

, § 2, eff. May 27, 2003;

2011, No. 39

, § 4, eff. May 19, 2011.

§ 2802.
Foreign fats prohibited.

A person, firm, or corporation, by himself or herself, his or her servant or agent, or as the servant or agent of another, shall not manufacture, sell, or exchange, or have in possession with intent to sell or exchange, any dairy products or any of the fluid or solid derivatives of any of them to which has been added any fat or oil other than milk fat, except chocolate ice cream and chocolate milk, which may contain the amount of fats other than milk fat normally contained in the chocolate or cocoa used in the manufacture of chocolate ice cream and chocolate milk. This section does not prohibit a fat substitute if it is approved for insertion into a dairy product by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration and is clearly identified in the list of ingredients on the label.

HISTORY:

Added

1965, No. 175

, § 15; amended

2011, No. 39

, § 4, eff. May 19, 2011.